Hawaii statutes.
§633-30 Counterclaim; retention of
jurisdiction. When the limit of the district court as provided by section
633-27 is exceeded in a counterclaim but within the jurisdictional limit of the
court as provided by section 604-5, the action shall nevertheless remain in the
small claims division of the district court and be tried therein in its
entirety; provided that the district court having jurisdiction over a civil
action involving summary possession shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the
small claims division of the district court over any security deposit dispute
between landlord and tenant in a residential landlord-tenant relationship. [L
1970, c 182, pt of §1; am L 1971, c 144, §24; am L 2005, c 12, §3]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next